Wisconsin, session 2025, AB282.
do enact as follows:AB282,15Section 1. 59.11 (4m) of the statutes is created to read:AB282,2,2159.11 (4m) (a) Except as provided in par. (b), sub. (3), and ss. 59.02 (2) and (3) 2and 59.12, the board may determine the rules of its own proceedings.AB282,2,73(b) The rules of proceedings under par. (a) may not prohibit the board from 4taking up an ordinance or resolution that is substantially similar or identical to an 5earlier ordinance or resolution that was taken up and voted upon but not enacted or 6adopted if the later ordinance or resolution is taken up at least 2 years after the 7earlier.AB282,28Section 2. 60.20 (4) of the statutes is created to read:AB282,2,10960.20 (4) Rules of proceedings. (a) Except as provided in par. (b) and sub. 10(2), the town board may determine the rules of its own proceedings.AB282,2,1511(b) The rules of proceedings under par. (a) may not prohibit the town board 12from taking up an ordinance or resolution that is substantially similar or identical 13to an earlier ordinance or resolution that was taken up and voted upon but not 14enacted or adopted if the later ordinance or resolution is taken up at least 2 years 15after the earlier.AB282,316Section 3. 61.32 of the statutes is renumbered 61.32 (1) and amended to 17read:AB282,2,201861.32 (1) The trustees of each village shall constitute a board designated the 19“Village Board of” (name of village) in which shall be vested all the powers of the 20village not specifically given some other officer.AB282,2,2221(2) A majority of the members-elect of the village board shall constitute a 22quorum, but a less number may adjourn from time to time.AB282,3,223(3) The president of the village board shall preside at all meetings of the 1village board when present. In the president’s absence the board may select 2another trustee to preside.AB282,3,43(4) (a) Regular meetings of the village board shall be held at such time as may 4be prescribed by their bylaws.AB282,3,75(b) Special meetings of the village board may be called by any 2 trustees in 6writing, filed with the clerk, who shall thereupon seasonably notify all the trustees 7of the time and place thereof in the manner directed by the bylaws.AB282,3,88(5) All meetings of the village board shall be open to the public.AB282,3,229(7) The village board shall keep a record of all its proceedings, and if there is 10a newspaper published in any village, the board shall cause the proceedings to be 11published therein as a class 1 notice, under ch. 985. The proceedings for the 12purpose of publication shall include the substance of every official action taken by 13the governing body. If there is no newspaper published in the village, the board 14may cause the proceedings to be published in a newspaper having general 15circulation in the village, posted in several public places or publicized in some other 16fashion, in such manner as the board directs. Nothing herein shall be construed as 17requiring the republication of any proceeding, ordinance, or other matter or thing 18which has already been published according to law, nor shall anything herein be 19construed to relieve any village from publishing any proceeding, ordinance or other 20matter or thing required by law to be published. Notwithstanding the provisions of 21s. 985.08 (4), the fee for any such publication shall not exceed the rates specified in 22s. 985.08 (1).AB282,4,223(8) The village board has power to preserve order at its meetings, compel 1attendance of trustees and punish nonattendance and it shall be judge of the 2election and qualification of its members.AB282,4,53(9) The president and board of trustees of any village, whether operating 4under general or special law, may by a three-fourths vote of all the members of the 5village board determine that a salary be paid the president and trustees.AB282,46Section 4. 61.32 (6) of the statutes is created to read:AB282,4,8761.32 (6) (a) Except as provided in par. (b) and subs. (2), (3), (4) (b), and (9), 8the village board may determine the rules of its own proceedings.AB282,4,139(b) The rules of proceedings under par. (a) may not prohibit the village board 10from taking up an ordinance or resolution that is substantially similar or identical 11to an earlier ordinance or resolution that was taken up and voted upon but not 12enacted or adopted if the later ordinance or resolution is taken up at least 2 years 13after the earlier.AB282,514Section 5. 62.03 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB282,4,171562.03 (1) This subchapter, except ss. 62.071, 62.08 (1), 62.09 (1) (e) and (11) 16(j), (k), and (m), 62.11 (3) (e) 2., 62.175, 62.23 (7) (em) and (he), and 62.237, does not 17apply to 1st class cities under special charter.AB282,618Section 6. 62.11 (3) (e) of the statutes is repealed and recreated to read:AB282,4,201962.11 (3) (e) 1. Except as provided in subd. 2. and pars. (b), (d), and (f), the 20common council may determine the rules of its own proceedings.AB282,5,2212. The rules of proceedings under subd. 1. may not prohibit the common 22council from taking up an ordinance or resolution that is substantially similar or 23identical to an earlier ordinance or resolution that was taken up and voted upon but 1not enacted or adopted if the later ordinance or resolution is taken up at least 2 2years after the earlier.AB282,5,33